pt-PT: Benefícios do spray para hálito: Antibacteriano; Refrescante do hálito; Prevenção de cáries; Alívio da boca seca; Equilíbrio do pH oral; Redução da placa; Suporte probiótico; Branqueamento dos dedos; Calmante para a garganta; Outro
es: Beneficio del aerosol para el aliento: Antibacteriano; Aliento fresco; Prevención de caries; Alivio de boca seca; Equilibrio del pH oral; Reducción de placa; Apoyo probiótico; Blanqueamiento dental; Alivio de garganta; Otros
sk-SK: Benefit spreja na dych: Anti-bakteriálne; Osvieženie dychu; Prevencia kazov; Úľava od suchosti v ústach; Vyváženie pH ústnej dutiny; Zníženie plaku; Probiotická podpora; Bielenie zubov; Upokojenie hrdla; Iné
lt-LT: Burnos purškalo nauda: Antibakterinė; Burnos gaiva; Ėduonies prevencija; Sausos burnos palengvinimas; Burnos pH balansavimas; Apnašų mažinimas; Probiotikų palaikymas; Dantų balikliai; Gerklės raminimas; Kita
ro-RO: Beneficiul spray-ului respirator: Anti-bacterian; Împrospătare respirație; Prevenire carii; Ameliorare uscăciune bucală; Echilibrare pH oral; Reducere placă bacteriană; Susținere probiotică; Albirea dinților; Calmare gât; Altele
nl: Voordeel ademspray: Antibacterieel; Adem verfrissend; Gaatjespreventie; Droge mond verlichting; Mondholte pH-balans; Plakreductie; Probiotische ondersteuning; Tanden bleken; Keel kalmerend; Andere
ru: Польза спрея для дыхания: Антибактериальный; Освежение дыхания; Профилактика кариеса; Облегчение сухости во рту; Балансировка pH полости рта; Уменьшение зубного налета; Пробиотическая поддержка; Отбеливание зубов; Успокаивающий для горла; Другой
th: ประโยชน์สเปรย์ลมหายใจ: ยับยั้งแบคทีเรีย; ดับกลิ่นปาก; ป้องกันฟันผุ; บรรเทาอาการปากแห้ง; ปรับสมดุลค่า pH ในช่องปาก; ลดคราบพลัค; เสริมโพรไบโอติก; การฟอกฟันขาว; ผ่อนคลายลำคอ; อื่นๆ
fi: Hengityssuihkeen hyöty: Antibakteerinen; Hengitystä raikastava; Reikiintymisen ehkäisy; Kuivan suun hoito; Suun pH:n tasapainotus; Plakin vähentäminen; Probioottiset tuet; Hampaiden valkaisu; Kurkun rauhoittava; Muu
ko: 구강 스프레이 혜택: 항균; 구취 제거; 충치 예방; 구강 건조 완화; 구강 pH 밸런싱; 플라그 감소; 프로바이오틱 지원; 치아 미백; 목 진정; 기타
pl: Korzyść sprayu do oddechu: Antybakteryjne; Odświeżający oddech; Zapobieganie próchnicy; Łagodzenie suchości jamy ustnej; Równoważenie pH jamy ustnej; Redukcja płytki nazębnej; Wsparcie probiotyczne; Wybielanie zębów; Łagodzenie gardła; Inne
vi: Lợi ích xịt thơm miệng: Chống vi khuẩn; Thơm miệng; Ngừa sâu răng; Giảm khô miệng; Cân bằng pH miệng; Giảm mảng bám; Hỗ trợ lợi khuẩn; Làm trắng răng; Làm dịu cổ họng; Khác
sl-SI: Korist pršila za dah: Protibakterijsko; Osvežitev diha; Preprečevanje kariesa; Lajšanje suhih ust; Uravnavanje ustnega pH; Zmanjšanje oblog; Probiotična podpora; Beljenje zob; Pomirjanje grla; Drugo
zh-TW: 口氣噴霧益處: 抗菌; 口氣清新; 預防蛀牙; 口乾舒緩; 口腔酸鹼平衡; 減少牙菌斑; 益生菌支持; 牙齒美白; 喉嚨舒緩; 其他
hu: Lélegzetfrissítő spray előnye: Antibakteriális; Lehelet frissítő; Fogszuvasodás megelőzés; Szájszárazság enyhítő; Száj pH kiegyensúlyozó; Lepedék csökkentés; Probiotikus támogatás; Fogfehérítés; Toroknyugtató; Egyéb
hr-HR: Korist spreja za dah: Antibakterijski; Osvježavanje daha; Prevencija karijesa; Ublažavanje suhih usta; Balansiranje pH usta; Smanjenje plaka; Probiotička podrška; Izbjeljivanje zubi; Smirivanje grla; Ostalo
en: Breath spray benefit: Anti-bacterial; Breath freshening; Cavity prevention; Dry mouth relief; Oral pH balancing; Plaque reduction; Probiotic support; Teeth whitening; Throat soothing; Other
bg-BG: Полза от освежителя за уста: Антибактериален; Освежаване на дъха; Превенция на кариеси; Облекчаване на суха уста; Балансиране на оралното pH; Намаляване на плаката; Пробиотична подкрепа; Избелване на зъби; Успокояване на гърлото; Други
el: Όφελος σπρέι αναπνοής: Αντιβακτηριδιακό; Φρεσκάρισμα αναπνοής; Πρόληψη τερηδόνας; Ανακούφιση ξηροστομίας; Εξισορρόπηση pH στόματος; Μείωση πλάκας; Προβιοτική υποστήριξη; Λεύκανση δοντιών; Καταπράυνση λαιμού; Άλλο
de: Atemspray-Vorteil: Antibakteriell; Atemerfrischend; Kariesprävention; Mundtrockenheits-Linderung; Oraler pH-Ausgleich; Plaquereduktion; Probiotische Unterstützung; Zahnaufhellung; Hals beruhigend; Sonstiges
da: Mundsprayfordel: Anti-bakteriel; Åndefriskende; Hulforebyggelse; Lindring af mundtørhed; Oral pH-balancering; Plakreduktion; Probiotisk støtte; Tandblegning; Halsberoligende; Andet
ja: ブレススプレー効果: 抗菌; 口臭予防; 虫歯予防; 口渇緩和; 口腔pHバランス; プラーク減少; プロバイオティクスサポート; 歯のホワイトニング; 喉の鎮静; その他
sv: Munsprayens nytta: Antibakteriell; Uppfriskande andedräkt; Förebyggande av hål i tänderna; Lindring av muntorrhet; pH-balansering i munnen; Plackminskning; Probiotiskt stöd; Tandblekning; Lugnande för halsen; Övrigt
zh-CN: 口腔喷雾益处: 抗菌; 清新口气; 预防蛀牙; 缓解口干; 口腔 pH 平衡; 减少牙菌斑; 益生菌支持; 牙齿美白; 舒缓咽喉; 其他
it: Beneficio dello spray per l'alito: Antibatterico; Alito fresco; Prevenzione carie; Sollievo bocca secca; Bilanciamento pH orale; Riduzione placca; Supporto probiotico; Sbiancante per denti; Lenitivo per gola; Altro
cs: Přínos ústního spreje: Antibakteriální; Osvěžení dechu; Prevence kazů; Úleva od suchosti v ústech; Vyrovnávání pH v ústech; Snížení plaku; Probiotická podpora; Bělení zubů; Zklidnění krku; Jiné
nb: Munnsprayffordel: Antibakteriell; Frisk pust; Forebygging av hull; Lindring av tørr munn; pH-balansering i munnen; Plakkreduksjon; Probiotisk støtte; Tannbleking; Beroligende for halsen; Annet
fr: Avantages du spray pour l’haleine: Antibactérien; Haleine fraîche; Prévention des caries; Soulagement de la bouche sèche; Équilibrage du pH buccal; Réduction de la plaque; Soutien probiotique; Blanchiment des dents; Apaisement de la gorge; Autre
pt-BR: Benefício do spray para hálito: Antibacteriano; Refrescante do hálito; Prevenção de cáries; Alívio da boca seca; Equilíbrio do pH oral; Redução de placa; Suporte probiótico; Branqueamento dental; Calmante para garganta; Outro
tr: Ağız spreyi faydası: Antibakteriyel; Nefes ferahlatıcı; Çürük önleyici; Ağız kuruluğu giderici; Ağız pH dengeleyici; Plak azaltıcı; Probiyotik desteği; Diş Beyazlatıcı; Boğaz yatıştırıcı; Diğer